North Carolina statutes. Chapter 140. State Art Museum; Symphony and Art Societies.
Article 2. North Carolina Symphony Society.

§ 140-6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 476, s. 89.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to the organization of the North Carolina Symphony Society, Inc., see G.S. 143B-94.

§ 140-7.
Adoption of bylaws; amendments.

The said board of trustees, when organized under the terms of this Article, shall have authority to adopt bylaws for the Society and said bylaws shall thereafter be subject to change only by a three-fifths vote of a quorum of said board of trustees.

History.

1943, c. 755, s. 3; 1947, c. 1049, s. 2.

§ 140-8.
Audit.

The operations of the North Carolina Symphony Society, Inc., shall be subject to the oversight of the State Auditor pursuant to Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes.

History.

1943, c. 755, s. 4; 1983, c. 913, s. 28.

§ 140-9.
Allocations from Contingency and Emergency Fund; expenditures.

The Governor and Council of State are hereby authorized to allot such sums as they may deem appropriate, from the Contingency and Emergency Fund, to the North Carolina Symphony Society, to aid in carrying on the activities of the said Society. All expenditures made by said Society shall be subject to the provisions of the State Budget Act, Chapter 143C of the General Statutes.

History.

1943, c. 755, s. 5; 1955, c. 1309; 2006-203, s. 80.

§ 140-10.
Counties and municipalities authorized to make contributions.

The governing body of any county or incorporated municipality is hereby authorized and empowered to appropriate and make voluntary contributions out of nontax funds to the North Carolina Symphony Society.

History.

1953, c. 1212.

§ 140-10.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-316, s. 5, effective January 1, 2014.

History.

1969, c. 100; repealed by 2013-316, s. 5, effective January 1, 2014.